Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 42.1. Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.

§ 59.1-479.
Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.”

History.
2000, c. 995.

Cross references.

For provision authorizing the State Board of Elections to conduct a pilot program providing for electronic notice and signing, consistent with this chapter, of a registered voter’s change of address, see §

24.2-424

A.

For provisions of the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act, see §

55.1-661

et seq.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala. §§

8-1

A-1 to

8-1

A-20.

Alaska: Alaska Stat. §§ 09.80.010 to 09.80.195.

Arkansas: A.C.A. §§ 25-32-101 to 25-32-120.

California: California Civ. Code § 1633.1 et seq.

Colorado: C.R.S. §§ 24-71.3-101 to 24-71.3-121.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat. §§ 1-266 to 1-286.

Delaware: 6 Del. C. §§ 12A-101 to 12A-117.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code §§ 28-4901 to 28-4918.

Florida: Fla. Stat. § 668.50.

Georgia: O.C.G.A. § 10-12-1 et seq.

Hawaii: H.R.S. §§ 489E-1 to 489E-19.

Idaho: Idaho Code §§ 28-50-101 to 28-50-120.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann. §§ 26-2-8-101 to 26-2-8-302.

Iowa: Iowa Code §§ 554D.101 to 554D.124.

Kansas: K.S.A. §§ 16-1601 to 16-1620.

Kentucky: K.R.S. §§ 369.101 to 369.120.

Louisiana: La. R.S. §§ 9:2601 to 9:2620.

Maine: 10 M.R.S. §§ 9401 to 9420.

Maryland: Md. Commercial Law Code Ann. §§ 21-101 to

21-120

.

Massachusetts: ALM GL ch. 110G, §§ 1 to 18.

Michigan: M.C.L.S. §§ 450.831 to 450.849.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. §§ 325L.01 to 325L.19.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann. §§ 75-12-1 to 75-12-39.

Missouri: §§ 432.200 to 432.295 R.S. Mo.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno. §§ 30-18-101 to 30-18-118.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 719.010 to 719.350.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. §§ 86-612 to 86-643.

New Hampshire: R.S.A. §§ 294-E:1 to 294-E:20.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat. §§ 12A:12-1 to 12A:12-26.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. § 14-16-1 et seq.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 66-311 to 66-330.

Ohio: O.R.C. Ann. §§ 1306.01 to 1306.23.

Oklahoma: 12A Okl. Stat. §§ 15-101 to 15-121.

Oregon: ORS §§ 84.001 to 84.061.

Pennsylvania: 73 P.S. §§ 2260.301 to 2260.312.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws §§ 42-127.1-1 to 42-107.1-20.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann. §§ 26-6-10 to 26-6-210.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. §§ 47-10-101 to 47-10-123.

Texas: Tex. Bus. and Com. Code § 322.001 et seq.

Utah: Utah Code Ann. 46-4-101 et seq.

Vermont: 9 V.S.A. §§ 270 to 290.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code §§ 39A-1-1 to 39A-1-17.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat. § 137.11 et seq.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat. §§ 40-21-101 to 40-21-119.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 212 provides: “That the Attorney General of Virginia, in consultation with the Secretary of Technology, shall develop and provide guidelines to the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.) and its implications on the state
agencies’ electronic transactions implementations. Upon receiving such guidelines, each agency shall examine provisions of the Code of Virginia specific to that agency and identify if any changes are necessary to facilitate the agency’s
implementation of electronic transactions and report such findings to the Secretary of Technology.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia technology law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1051. (2000).

For 2002 survey of Virginia technology law, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 341 (2002).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 6 Pleadings Generally. § 6.02 Filing of Pleadings. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 8A-248 Provision — Counterparts and Facsimiles, etc.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Voter registration applications. —

Although no law requires the acceptance of mailed voter registration applications with electronic signatures, the State Board of Elections is not precluded from directing that general registrars accept such applications, and the State Board, in its discretion,
may do so. The State Board also has discretionary authority to establish criteria to preserve the security of confidential voter information and to ensure the authenticity and validity of electronic signatures. See opinion of Attorney
General to Messrs. James M. Hinshaw, Daniel H. Haworth, W. Donald Brown, City of Norfolk Electoral Board, 13-111, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (9/26/14).

§ 59.1-480.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agreement” means the bargain of the parties in fact, as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances and from rules, regulations, and procedures given the effect of agreements under laws otherwise applicable to a particular transaction.

“Automated transaction” means a transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means or electronic records, in which the acts or records of one or both parties are not reviewed by an individual in the ordinary course in forming
a contract, performing under an existing contract, or fulfilling an obligation required by the transaction.

“Computer program” means a set of statements or instructions to be used directly or indirectly in an information processing system in order to bring about a certain result.

“Contract” means the total legal obligation resulting from the parties’ agreement as affected by this chapter and other applicable law.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic agent” means a computer program or an electronic or other automated means used independently to initiate an action or respond to electronic records or performances in whole or in part, without review or action by an individual.

“Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

“Information” means data, text, images, sounds, codes, computer programs, software, databases, or the like.

“Information processing system” means an electronic system for creating, generating, sending, receiving, storing, displaying, or processing information.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public body, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Public body” shall have the same meaning as defined in §

2.2-3701

and shall also include locally elected constitutional officers, and anyone performing the duties of locally elected constitutional officers.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Security procedure” means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. The term includes
a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band, or
an Alaskan native village, which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

“Transaction” means an action or set of actions occurring between two or more persons relating to the conduct of business, commercial, or governmental affairs.

History.
2000, c. 995; 2005, c. 417.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 417 inserted “and shall also include locally elected constitutional officers, and anyone performing the duties of locally elected constitutional officers” at the end of subdivison (12).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Voter registration applications. —

Although no law requires the acceptance of mailed voter registration applications with electronic signatures, the State Board of Elections is not precluded from directing that general registrars accept such applications, and the State Board, in its discretion,
may do so. The State Board also has discretionary authority to establish criteria to preserve the security of confidential voter information and to ensure the authenticity and validity of electronic signatures. See opinion of Attorney
General to Messrs. James M. Hinshaw, Daniel H. Haworth, W. Donald Brown, City of Norfolk Electoral Board, 13-111, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (9/26/14).

§ 59.1-481.
Scope.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), this chapter applies to electronic records and electronic signatures relating to a transaction.

This chapter does not apply to a transaction to the extent it is governed by:

A law governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils, or testamentary trusts; and

Title 8.1A except §

8.1A-306

, Title 8.3A, Title 8.4, Title 8.4A, Title 8.5A, Title 8.7, Title 8.8A, Title 8.9A, Title 8.10, and Title 8.11.

This chapter applies to an electronic record or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of this chapter under subsection (b) to the extent it is governed by law other than those specified in subsection (b).

A transaction subject to this chapter is also subject to other applicable substantive law.

History.
2000, c. 995; 2001, c. 86; 2003, c. 353; 2011, c. 369.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 86 inserted “and” at the end of subdivision (b)(1), deleted “and” at the end of subdivision (b)(2), and deleted former subdivision (b)(3), which read: “Article 4 (§

17.1-255

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 17.1.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 353, in subdivision (a)(2), substituted “8.1A” for “8.1” and “§

8.1A-306

” for “§§ 8.1-107 and 8.1-206.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 369 deleted “Title 8.6A” following “Title 8.5A” in subdivision (b) (2).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Voter registration applications. —

Although no law requires the acceptance of mailed voter registration applications with electronic signatures, the State Board of Elections is not precluded from directing that general registrars accept such applications, and the State Board, in its discretion,
may do so. The State Board also has discretionary authority to establish criteria to preserve the security of confidential voter information and to ensure the authenticity and validity of electronic signatures. See opinion of Attorney
General to Messrs. James M. Hinshaw, Daniel H. Haworth, W. Donald Brown, City of Norfolk Electoral Board, 13-111, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (9/26/14).

§ 59.1-482.
Prospective application.

This chapter applies to any electronic record or electronic signature created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored on or after the effective date of this chapter.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-483.
Use of electronic records and electronic signatures; variation by agreement.

This chapter does not require a record or signature to be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, stored, or otherwise processed or used by electronic means or in electronic form.

This chapter applies only to transactions between parties each of which has agreed to conduct transactions by electronic means. Whether the parties agree to conduct a transaction by electronic means is determined from the context and surrounding circumstances,
including the parties’ conduct. Except for a separate and optional agreement the primary purpose of which is to authorize a transaction to be conducted by electronic means, an agreement to conduct a transaction electronically may
not be contained in a standard form contract unless that term is conspicuously displayed and separately consented to. An agreement to conduct a transaction electronically may not be inferred solely from the fact that a party has
used electronic means to pay an account or register a purchase warranty. This subsection may not be varied by agreement.

A party that agrees to conduct a transaction by electronic means may refuse to conduct other transactions by electronic means. The right granted by this subsection may not be waived by agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the effect of any of the provisions of this chapter may be varied by agreement. The presence in this chapter of the words “unless otherwise agreed,” or words of similar import, does not imply that the effect
of other provisions may not be varied by agreement.

Whether an electronic record or electronic signature has legal consequences is determined by this chapter and other applicable law.

History.
2000, c. 995.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Voter registration applications. —

Although no law requires the acceptance of mailed voter registration applications with electronic signatures, the State Board of Elections is not precluded from directing that general registrars accept such applications, and the State Board, in its discretion,
may do so. The State Board also has discretionary authority to establish criteria to preserve the security of confidential voter information and to ensure the authenticity and validity of electronic signatures. See opinion of Attorney
General to Messrs. James M. Hinshaw, Daniel H. Haworth, W. Donald Brown, City of Norfolk Electoral Board, 13-111, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (9/26/14).

§ 59.1-484.
Construction and application.

This chapter shall be construed and applied to:

Facilitate electronic transactions consistent with other applicable law;

Be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic transactions and with the continued expansion of those practices; and

Effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-485.
Legal recognition of electronic records, electronic signatures, and electronic contracts.

A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.

A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation.

If a law requires a record to be in writing, an electronic record satisfies the law.

If a law requires a signature, or provides for certain consequences in the absence of a signature, an electronic signature satisfies the law.

History.
2000, c. 995.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Electronic notarial acts

currently performed by Virginia notaries would constitute valid notarial acts under the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, provided such acts comply with all other applicable statutes and regulations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable
John T. Frey, Clerk of the Circuit Court for Fairfax County, 08-089, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (2/2/09).

§ 59.1-486.
Provision of information in writing; presentation of records.

If parties have agreed to conduct a transaction by electronic means and a law requires a person to provide, send, or deliver information in writing to another person, the requirement is satisfied if the information is provided, sent, or delivered, as
the case may be, in an electronic record capable of retention by the recipient at the time of receipt. An electronic record is not capable of retention by the recipient if the sender or its information processing system inhibits
the ability of the recipient to print or store the electronic record.

If a law other than this chapter requires a record (i) to be posted or displayed in a certain manner, (ii) to be sent, communicated, or transmitted by a specified method, or (iii) to contain information that is formatted in a certain manner, the following
rules apply:

The record shall be posted or displayed in the manner specified in the other law.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) (2), the record shall be sent, communicated, or transmitted by the method specified in the other law.

The record shall contain the information formatted in the manner specified in the other law.

If a sender inhibits the ability of a recipient to store or print an electronic record, the electronic record is not enforceable against the recipient.

The requirements of this section may not be varied by agreement, except:

To the extent a law other than this chapter requires information to be provided, sent, or delivered in writing but permits that requirement to be varied by agreement, the requirement under subsection (a) that the information be in the form of an electronic
record capable of retention may also be varied by agreement; and

A requirement under a law other than this chapter to send, communicate, or transmit a record by United States mail, may be varied by agreement to the extent permitted by the other law.

Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (d), a governmental agency may by regulation alter requirements governing (i) the method of posting or display, (ii) the manner of communication or transmittal, including First Class or other United States mail requirements,
or (iii) formatting requirements, with respect to the matters over which that agency has jurisdiction and with respect to transactions that the parties have agreed to conduct by electronic means.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-487.
Attribution and effect of electronic record and electronic signature.

An electronic record or electronic signature is attributable to a person if it was the act of the person. The act of the person may be shown in any manner, including a showing of the efficacy of any security procedure applied to determine the person to
which the electronic record or electronic signature was attributable.

The effect of an electronic record or electronic signature attributed to a person under subsection (a) is determined from the context and surrounding circumstances at the time of its creation, execution, or adoption, including the parties’ agreement,
if any, and otherwise as provided by law.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-488.
Effect of change or error.

If a change or error in an electronic record occurs in a transmission between parties to a transaction, the following rules apply:

If the parties have agreed to use a security procedure to detect changes or errors and one party has conformed to the procedure, but the other party has not, and the nonconforming party would have detected the change or error had that party also conformed,
the conforming party may avoid the effect of the changed or erroneous electronic record.

In an automated transaction involving an individual, the individual may avoid the effect of an electronic record that resulted from an error made by the individual in dealing with the electronic agent of another person if the electronic agent did not
provide an opportunity for the prevention or correction of the error and, at the time the individual learns of the error, the individual:

Promptly notifies the other person of the error and that the individual did not intend to be bound by the electronic record received by the other person;

Takes reasonable steps, including steps that conform to the other person’s reasonable instructions, to return to the other person or, if instructed by the other person, to destroy the consideration received, if any, as a result of the erroneous electronic
record; and

Has not used or received any benefit or value from the consideration, if any, received from the other person.

If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) applies, the change or error has the effect provided by other law, including the law of mistake, and the parties’ contract, if any.

Paragraphs (2) and (3) may not be varied by agreement.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-489.
Notarization and acknowledgment.

If a law requires a signature or record to be notarized, acknowledged, verified, or made under oath, the requirement is satisfied if the electronic signature of the person authorized to perform those acts, together with all other information required
to be included by other applicable law, is attached to or logically associated with the signature or record.

History.
2000, c. 995.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 160, cl. 2, effective March 16, 2009, provides: “That any document notarized electronically pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-489 of the Code of Virginia that otherwise appears on its face to be properly notarized shall be presumed to
have been notarized properly in accordance with the laws and regulations of the Commonwealth.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-1801 Acknowledgment by Notary Public, etc.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Electronic notarial acts

currently performed by Virginia notaries would constitute valid notarial acts under the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, provided such acts comply with all other applicable statutes and regulations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable
John T. Frey, Clerk of the Circuit Court for Fairfax County, 08-089, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (2/2/09).

§ 59.1-490.
Retention of electronic record.

If a law requires that a record be retained, the requirement is satisfied by retaining an electronic record of the information in the record which:

Accurately reflects the information set forth in the record at the time and after it was first generated in its final form as an electronic record or otherwise; and

Remains accessible for later reference.

A requirement to retain a record in accordance with subsection (a) does not apply to any information the sole purpose of which is to enable the record to be sent, communicated, or received.

A person may satisfy subsection (a) by using the services of another person if the requirements of that subsection are satisfied.

If a law requires a record to be presented or retained in its original form, or provides consequences if the record is not presented or retained in its original form, that law is satisfied by an electronic record retained in accordance with subsection
(a).

If a law requires retention of a check, that requirement is satisfied by retention of an electronic record of the information on the front and back of the check in accordance with subsection (a).

A record retained as an electronic record in accordance with subsection A satisfies a law requiring a person to retain a record for evidentiary, audit, or like purposes, unless a law enacted after the effective date of this chapter specifically prohibits
the use of an electronic record for the specified purpose.

This section does not preclude a public body of the Commonwealth from specifying additional requirements for the retention of a record subject to such public body’s jurisdiction.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-491.
Admissibility of evidence.

In any proceeding, evidence of a record or signature may not be excluded solely because it is in electronic form.

In determining the evidentiary weight to be given a particular electronic signature, the trier of fact shall consider whether the electronic signature is: (i) unique to the signer, (ii) capable of verification, (iii) under the signer’s sole control, (iv)
linked to the record in such a manner that it can be determined if any data contained in the record was changed subsequent to the electronic signature being affixed to the record, and (v) created by a method appropriately reliable
for the purpose for which the electronic signature was used. The trier of fact may consider any other relevant and probative evidence affecting the authenticity and/or validity of the electronic signature.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-492.
Automated transactions.

In an automated transaction, the following rules apply:

A contract may be formed by the interaction of electronic agents of the parties, even if no individual was aware of or reviewed the electronic agents’ actions or the resulting terms and agreements.

A contract may be formed by the interaction of an electronic agent and an individual, acting on the individual’s own behalf or for another person, including by an interaction in which the individual performs actions that the individual is free to refuse
to perform and which the individual knows or has reason to know will cause the electronic agent to complete the transaction or performance.

The terms of the contract are determined by the substantive law applicable to the contract.

History.
2000, c. 995.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

§ 59.1-493.
Time and place of sending and receipt.

Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic record is sent when it:

Is addressed properly or otherwise directed properly to an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic records or information of the type sent and from which the recipient is able to
retrieve the electronic record;

Is in a form capable of being processed by that system; and

Enters an information processing system outside the control of the sender or of a person that sent the electronic record on behalf of the sender or enters a region of the information processing system designated or used by the recipient which is under
the control of the recipient.

Unless otherwise agreed between a sender and the recipient, an electronic record is received when:

It enters an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic records or information of the type sent and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic record; and

It is in a form capable of being processed by that system.

Subsection (b) applies even if the place the information processing system is located is different from the place the electronic record is deemed to be received under subsection (d).

Unless otherwise expressly provided in the electronic record or agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic record is deemed to be sent from the sender’s place of business and to be received at the recipient’s place of business. For purposes
of this subsection, the following rules apply:

If the sender or recipient has more than one place of business, the place of business of that person is the place having the closest relationship to the underlying transaction.

If the sender or the recipient does not have a place of business, the place of business is the sender’s or recipient’s residence, as the case may be.

An electronic record is received under subsection (b) even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment from an information processing system described in subsection (b) establishes that a record was received but, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

If a person is aware that an electronic record purportedly sent under subsection (a), or purportedly received under subsection (b), was not actually sent or received, the legal effect of the sending or receipt is determined by other applicable law. Except
to the extent permitted by the other law, the requirements of this subsection may not be varied by agreement.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-494.
Transferable records.

In this section, “transferable record” means an electronic record that:

Would be a note under Title 8.3A or a document under Title 8.7 if the electronic record were in writing; and

The issuer of the electronic record expressly has agreed is a transferable record.

A person has control of a transferable record if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the transferable record reliably establishes that person as the person to which the transferable record was issued or transferred.

A system satisfies subsection (b), and a person is deemed to have control of a transferable record, if the transferable record is created, stored, and assigned in such a manner that:

A single authoritative copy of the transferable record exists which is unique, identifiable, and, except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (4), (5), and (6), unalterable;

The authoritative copy identifies the person asserting control as:

The person to which the transferable record was issued; or

If the authoritative copy indicates that the transferable record has been transferred, the person to which the transferable record was most recently transferred;

The authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the person asserting control or its designated custodian;

Copies or revisions that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the person asserting control;

Each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

Any revision of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

Except as otherwise agreed, a person having control of a transferable record is the holder, as defined in §

8.1A-201

(21), of the transferable record and has the same rights and defenses as a holder of an equivalent record or writing under

Titles 8.1
A through 8.11, including, if the applicable statutory requirements under §§

8.3A-302 (a)

,

8.7-501

, or §

8.9A-330

are satisfied, the rights and defenses of a holder in due course, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated, or a purchaser, respectively. Delivery, possession, and endorsement are
not required to obtain or exercise any of the rights under this subsection.

Except as otherwise agreed, an obligor under a transferable record has the same rights and defenses as an equivalent obligor under equivalent records or writings under

Titles 8.1
A through 8.11.

If requested by a person against which enforcement is sought, the person seeking to enforce the transferable record shall provide reasonable proof that the person is in control of the transferable record. Proof may include access to the authoritative
copy of the transferable record and related business records sufficient to review the terms of the transferable record and to establish the identity of the person having control of the transferable record.

History.
2000, c. 995; 2001, c. 86; 2003, c. 353.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 86 substituted “§

8.9A-330

” for “§ 8.9-308” in subsection (d).

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 353, in subdivision (c)(1), substituted “subdivisions” for “paragraphs”; in subsection (d), substituted “8.1A-201 (21)” for “8.1-201 (20)” and “8.1A” for “8.1”; and in subsection (e), substituted “8.1A” for “8.1.”

§ 59.1-495.
Creation and retention of electronic records and conversion of written records by public bodies of the Commonwealth.

Upon providing protection to preserve security and confidentiality, every public body of the Commonwealth may create and retain electronic records and convert written records to electronic records.

History.
2000, c. 995.

§ 59.1-496.
Acceptance and distribution of electronic records by public bodies; electronic filing of information permitted.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of § 59.1-490, and upon providing protection to preserve security and confidentiality, public bodies of the Commonwealth may (i) accept the electronic filing of any information required or permitted to be
filed with such public body and (ii) prescribe the methods of executing, recording, reproducing, and certifying electronically filed information pursuant to subsection (b). Unless otherwise provided for in the Code of Virginia,
electronic filing in the courts of this Commonwealth shall be governed by the Rules adopted by the Supreme Court of Virginia.

To the extent that public bodies of the Commonwealth use electronic records and electronic signatures and accept electronic filings under subsection (a), the following rules apply:

Public bodies of the Commonwealth may specify the manner and format in which the electronic records must be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, and stored and the systems established for those purposes;

Public bodies of the Commonwealth may specify the type of electronic signature required, the manner and format in which the electronic signature must be affixed to the electronic record, and the identity of, or criteria that must be met by, any third
party used by a person filing a document to facilitate the process;

Public bodies of the Commonwealth may specify control processes and procedures as appropriate to ensure adequate preservation, disposition, integrity, security, confidentiality, and auditability of electronic records; and

Public bodies of the Commonwealth may establish other criteria to ensure the authenticity and validity of electronic signatures.

Except as otherwise provided in § 59.1-490 (f), this chapter does not require public bodies of the Commonwealth to use or permit the use of electronic records or signatures.

History.
2000, c. 995.

Cross references.

As to the promulgation of policies concerned with the use of electronic signatures by the Chief Information Officer, see §

2.2-2007

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Voter registration applications. —

Although no law requires the acceptance of mailed voter registration applications with electronic signatures, the State Board of Elections is not precluded from directing that general registrars accept such applications, and the State Board, in its discretion,
may do so. The State Board also has discretionary authority to establish criteria to preserve the security of confidential voter information and to ensure the authenticity and validity of electronic signatures. See opinion of Attorney
General to Messrs. James M. Hinshaw, Daniel H. Haworth, W. Donald Brown, City of Norfolk Electoral Board, 13-111, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (9/26/14).

§ 59.1-497.
Interoperability.

A public body of the Commonwealth that adopts standards pursuant to § 59.1-496 and the Secretary of Administration may encourage and promote consistency and interoperability with similar requirements adopted by other public bodies of the Commonwealth,
other states and the federal government and nongovernmental persons interacting with public bodies of the Commonwealth. If appropriate, those standards may specify differing levels of standards from which public bodies of the Commonwealth
may choose in implementing the most appropriate standard for a particular application.

History.
2000, c. 995; 2020, c. 738.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 738 substituted “that” for “which” and “Administration” for “Technology” in the first sentence.

§§ 59.1-498 through 59.1-501.
Reserved.